Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-107 Reciprocal insurance.
Reciprocal insurance means that insurance resulting from the exchange of
insurance contracts among subscribers of an unincorporated association, the
interexchange being effectuated through an attorney-in-fact common to all such
subscribers, thereby providing insurance coverage on each other. [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next